Florida, session 2026, HB1131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 196.1975, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
196.1975 Exemption for property used by nonprofit homes
for the aged.—Nonprofit homes for the aged are exempt to the
extent that they meet the following criteria:
(1) The applicant must be a corporation not for profit
under pursuant to chapter 617 or a Florida limited partnership,
the sole general partner of which is either a corporation not
for profit under pursuant to chapter 617 or is wholly owned by a
corporation not for profit under chapter 617 and not licensed
under chapter 429, and the corporation not for profit must have
been exempt as of January 1 of the year for which exemption from
ad valorem property taxes is requested from federal income
taxation by having qualified as an exempt charitable
organization under the provisions of s. 501(c)(3) of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1131-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1131 2026
Internal Revenue Code of 1954 or of the corresponding section of
a subsequently enacted federal revenue act.
Section 2. The amendments made by this act to s.
196.1975(1), Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 ad
valorem tax roll.
Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1131-00